Idaho, session 2025, S1180.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 49, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 49-1432, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
49-1432. AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE READERS -- DATA ACCESS AND CON-
TROL. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Agency" means the state of Idaho, any political subdivision of the
state of Idaho, or any agency thereof.
(b) "Automated license plate reader" means a device that passively
records license plates of vehicles on a roadway or any similar device.
(c) "Traffic flow analysis" means the study and real-time use of data
regarding vehicles moving through a transportation network in order to
improve traffic flow, reduce congestion, and increase safety.
(2) An agency may use an automated license plate reader and its data
for law enforcement purposes, traffic flow analysis purposes, or both. An
agency that uses an automated license plate reader for law enforcement pur-
poses shall do so pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The device and its data shall not be used for any purpose other than
the investigation of felony or misdemeanor crimes or traffic accidents
or to search for missing or endangered persons; and
(b) The device and its data shall not be used to enforce traffic infrac-
tions other than those associated with a traffic accident.
(3) Access to automated license plate reader data shall be limited to an
agency's authorized personnel. Agencies shall implement access controls to
ensure that only individuals with appropriate clearance are able to retrieve
automated license plate reader data.
(4) Except as expressly allowed pursuant to this section, automated
license plate reader data shall not be used for any non-law enforcement
purpose, including but not limited to personal use, political activity, or
surveillance unrelated to the purposes described in subsection (2)(a) of
this section.
(5) A person who misuses automated license plate reader data pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section shall be subject to discipline, adminis-
trative penalties, and criminal prosecution, if applicable.


(6) Each agency that uses automated license plate readers shall conduct
mandatory training for all authorized users regarding data privacy, legal
compliance, and ethical use of automated license plate reader systems.
(7) All access to and queries of automated license plate reader data
shall be logged in a secure audit system to include user identity, date,
time, and the purpose of access.
(8) Agencies shall conduct semiannual audits of automated license
plate reader data access logs to detect and address any unauthorized or sus-
picious activity.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-428, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-428. DISPLAY OF PLATE AND STICKERS. (1) License plates assigned to
a motor vehicle shall be attached, one (1) in the front, if the vehicle is
equipped with a front license plate mounting bracket, and the other in the
rear, with the exception of the following:
(a) The license plate assigned to a motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle,
utility type vehicle, motorbike or semitrailer and the license plate
assigned to a motor vehicle operated by a manufacturer, repossession
agent or dealer shall be attached to the rear.
(b) Vehicles displaying year of manufacture, old timer, classic car,
street rod, or custom vehicle license plates shall be allowed to display
one (1) plate attached to the rear of the vehicle.
(c) The license plate attached to a tractor shall be attached to the
front.
(d) The wrecker plate shall be displayed on the vehicle being towed in
such a manner as to be visible when the vehicle being towed is approached
from the rear.
License plates shall be displayed during the current registration year. The
annual registration sticker for the current registration year shall be dis-
played on each license plate, except for trailers, semitrailers, and commer-
cial vehicles over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds under the provisions
of sections 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this title,
the license plates together with the registration stickers shall be consid-
ered as license plates for the year designated on the registration sticker.
For purposes of this chapter, a validation sticker issued to the operator of
an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike under the provi-
sions of sections 67-7122 and 67-7124, Idaho Code, shall be considered the
registration sticker.
(2) Every license plate shall at all times be securely fastened to the
vehicle to which it is assigned to prevent the plate from swinging, be at a
height not less than twelve (12) inches from the ground, measuring from the
bottom of the plate, be in a place and position to be clearly visible, and be
maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly legi-
ble, and all registration stickers shall be securely attached to the license
plates and shall be displayed as provided in section 49-443(4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.